South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3623.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-7-3450 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (D) In addition to the requirements of this section to provide a mechanism for reporting a patient's personal medical care concerns, every hospital operating in this State must post and provide to the patient's family a list of all agencies or other entities to which concerns regarding the healthcare provider and the healthcare facility may be reported. The list must include telephone and electronic contact information and the specific area of oversight or regulation of the agency or entity. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----